Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-117
Examiners; expenses; payment.

The Director of Administrative Services is, upon presentation of a voucher properly countersigned by the Director of Insurance, authorized to draw warrants against the Department of Insurance Cash Fund for the purpose of paying the salaries and expenses of the personnel of the actuarial and examining staff of the Department of Insurance.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 21, p. 407;

R.S.1913, § 3157;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. III, § 14, p. 585;

Laws 1921, c. 24, § 2, p. 150;

C.S.1922, § 7758;

Laws 1923, c. 189, § 1, p. 433;

C.S.1929, § 44-214;

R.S.1943, § 44-117;

Laws 1955, c. 169, § 2, p. 485;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 12.